Utah statutes.
78B-6-102.   Legislative intent and findings -- Best interest of child --
Interests of each party.
(1)  It is the intent and desire of the Legislature that in every adoption the
best interest of the child should govern and be of foremost concern in the
court's determination.
(2)  The court shall make a specific finding regarding the best interest of
the child, taking into consideration information provided to the court
pursuant to the requirements of this chapter relating to the health, safety,
and welfare of the child and the moral climate of the potential adoptive
placement.
(3)  The Legislature finds that the rights and interests of all parties
affected by an adoption proceeding must be considered and balanced in
determining what constitutional protections and processes are necessary and
appropriate.
(4)  The Legislature specifically finds that it is not in a child's best
interest to be adopted by a person or persons who are cohabiting in a
relationship that is not a legally valid and binding marriage under the laws
of this state.  Nothing in this section limits or prohibits the court's
placement of a child with a single adult who is not cohabiting as defined in
this part.
(5)  The Legislature also finds that:
(a)  the state has a compelling interest in providing stable and permanent
homes for adoptive children in a prompt manner, in preventing the disruption
of adoptive placements, and in holding parents accountable for meeting the
needs of children;
(b)  an unmarried mother, faced with the responsibility of making crucial
decisions about the future of a newborn child, is entitled to privacy, and has
the right to make timely and appropriate decisions regarding her future and
the future of the child, and is entitled to assurance regarding the permanence
of an adoptive placement;
(c)  adoptive children have a right to permanence and stability in adoptive
placements;
(d)  adoptive parents have a constitutionally protected liberty and privacy
interest in retaining custody of an adopted child;
(e)  an unmarried biological father has an inchoate interest that acquires
constitutional protection only when he demonstrates a timely and full
commitment to the responsibilities of parenthood, both during pregnancy and
upon the child's birth; and
(f)   the state has a compelling interest in requiring unmarried biological
fathers to demonstrate commitment by providing appropriate medical care and
financial support and by establishing legal paternity, in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter.
(6) (a)  In enacting this chapter, the Legislature has prescribed the
conditions for determining whether an unmarried biological father's action is
sufficiently prompt and substantial to require constitutional protection.
(b)  If an unmarried biological father fails to grasp the opportunities to
establish a relationship with his child that are available to him, his
biological parental interest may be lost entirely, or greatly diminished in
constitutional significance by his failure to timely exercise it, or by his
failure to strictly comply with the available legal steps to substantiate it.
(c)  A certain degree of finality is necessary in order to facilitate the
state's compelling interest.  The Legislature finds that the interests of the
state, the mother, the child, and the adoptive parents described in this
section outweigh the interest of an unmarried biological father who does not
timely grasp the opportunity to establish and demonstrate a relationship with
his child in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.
(d)  The Legislature finds no practical way to remove all risk of fraud or
misrepresentation in adoption proceedings, and has provided a method for
absolute protection of an unmarried biological father's rights by compliance
with the provisions of this chapter.  In balancing the rights and interests of
the state, and of all parties affected by fraud, specifically the child, the
adoptive parents, and the unmarried biological father, the Legislature has
determined that the unmarried biological father is in the best position to
prevent or ameliorate the effects of fraud and that, therefore, the burden of
fraud shall be borne by him.
(e)  An unmarried biological father has the primary responsibility to protect
his rights.
(f)  An unmarried biological father is presumed to know that the child may be
adopted without his consent unless he strictly complies with the provisions of
this chapter, manifests a prompt and full commitment to his parental
responsibilities, and establishes paternity.
(7)  The Legislature finds that an unmarried mother has a right of privacy
with regard to her pregnancy and adoption plan, and therefore has no legal
obligation to disclose the identity of an unmarried biological father prior to
or during an adoption proceeding, and has no obligation to volunteer
information to the court with respect to the father.
